Nevada, session 83, AB32.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. During the 2025-2026 interim, the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on Growth and Infrastructure shall
conduct a study concerning the Nevada Commission for the
Reconstruction of the V & T Railway of Carson City and Storey
County.
2. The study must include, without limitation, a comprehensive
evaluation of the Commission that examines the current structure,
duties and powers of the Commission and the long-term financial
viability of the Commission.
3. The Committee shall include its findings and
recommendations for legislation relating to the study in the report
required by subsection 4 of NRS 218E.330 to be prepared and
submitted to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the 84th Session of the Legislature, including, without
limitation:
(a) Whether legislation should be proposed which:
(1) Reorganizes the structure of the Commission or modifies
the duties or powers of the Commission;
(2) Improves the long-term financial viability of the
Commission; or
(3) Terminates the Commission and addresses related issues,
including, without limitation, disposition of the assets of the
Commission.
(b) Recommendations for actions that the Commission or any
other entity may take to improve the long-term financial viability of
the Commission.
4. When making recommendations pursuant to subsection 3,
the Committee shall consider any relevant opinion issued by the
Attorney General.
H
-
*AB32*